Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 1871.
Department of Public Safety; Commissioner.

The Department of Public Safety, created by

3 V.S.A. § 212

, shall include a Commissioner of Public Safety.

The head of the Department shall be the Commissioner of Public Safety, who shall be a citizen of the United States and shall be selected on the basis of training, experience, and qualifications. The Commissioner shall be appointed by the Governor, with the advice and consent of the Senate.

The Commissioner of Public Safety may contract for security and related traffic control, and receive reimbursement for reasonable costs that shall include costs associated with providing personnel, benefits, equipment, vehicles, insurances, and related expenses. These reimbursements shall be credited to a special fund established pursuant to 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5, and be available to offset costs of providing those services.

The Commissioner of Public Safety shall collect fees for the termination of alarms at State Police facilities and for response to false alarms.

Termination Fees.

The termination fee for a single dedicated circuit alarm at a State Police facility will be $250.00 per user per year.

An alarm company or monitoring service that is authorized to install a multi-unit alarm panel at a State Police facility will be assessed a fee of $25.00 per alarm with a minimum fee of $250.00 per panel per year.

An individual or business who programs a tape dialer or other automatic notification device to transmit a voice message to a State Police facility, informing the police of a burglary or other emergency, must register such dialer with the State Police facility and will be assessed a registration fee of $50.00 per year. The fee includes an onsite inspection by a member of the State Police.

If State Police respond to an alarm and it is found that the alarm was transmitted by an unregistered tape dialer or similar notification device, a registration fee of $50.00 will be assessed subsequent to that response. Unpaid registration fees are considered to be alarms in default and handled in accordance with the provisions of the section on response terminations.

False Alarms.

A false alarm is notification given to the State Police by electronic or telephonic means that an emergency situation exists, when an emergency or other circumstance that could be perceived as an emergency does not exist and to which the State Police have responded.

Alarm periods shall be based on the calendar year, January 1 through December 31.

The first false alarm in an alarm period shall be at no cost. The second false alarm in the alarm period shall be assessed at $50.00 and each successive false alarm in the same alarm period shall be assessed at $75.00.

Response Terminations.

Alarm fees that have been assessed and not paid for a period of 60 days from the date of the last billing are considered alarms in default and the State Police station commander, with the concurrence of the State Police troop commander, may notify the alarm holder that the State Police will no longer respond to alarms at that location as long as the alarm holder is in default.

When in the opinion of the station commander, with the concurrence with the troop commander, there exists a chronic false alarm problem that the alarm holder appears not to have taken reasonable measures to correct, the station commander may send notification that the State Police will no longer respond to alarms at that location until the problem is corrected even if the alarm holder is not in default on fees assessed.

Appeal. An alarm holder may appeal a decision of the station commander to the troop commander.

The Commissioner of Public Safety may enter into contractual arrangements to perform dispatching functions for State, municipal, or other emergency services.

Charges collected under subsections (e), (f), and (i) of this section shall be credited to the Vermont Law Telecommunications Special Fund and shall be available to the Department to offset the costs of providing the services.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 36, eff. March 1, 1961;

1985, No. 4

, eff. March 9, 1985;

1995, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 342, eff. May 22, 1996;

1995, No. 186

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. May 22, 1996;

1999, No. 49

, § 161;

1999, No. 66

(Adj. Sess.), § 49, eff. Feb. 8, 2000;

2005, No. 209

(Adj. Sess.), § 30;

2019, No. 166

(Adj. Sess.), § 25, eff. Oct. 1, 2020.

§ 1872.
Duties of Commissioner generally.

The Commissioner shall be the chief enforcement officer of all the statutes and rules pertaining to the law of the road and the display of lights on vehicles. In addition, the Commissioner shall supervise and direct the activities of the State Police and of the Vermont Crime Information Center and, as Fire Marshal, be responsible for enforcing the laws pertaining to the investigation of fires, the prevention of fires, the promotion of fire safety, and the delivery of fire service training.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 214

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2003, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 1, 2005;

2021, No. 20

, § 154.

§ 1872a.
Repealed. 2009, No. 33, § 83(i)(4).

§ 1873.
Repealed. 2019, No. 166 (Adj. Sess.), § 25, eff. Oct. 1, 2020.

§ 1874.
Organization of Department by Commissioner.

The Commissioner, with the approval of the Governor, shall so organize and arrange the Department as will best and most efficiently promote its work and carry out the objectives of this chapter. To that end, the Commissioner may, with the Governor’s approval, create, rearrange, and abolish divisions, establish grades, ranks, and positions to be held by members, and formulate, put into effect, alter, and repeal rules for the administration of the Department.

The Commissioner may, in accordance with the rules adopted by him or her, designate or change the rank or grade to be held by a member. The Commissioner may assign or transfer members to serve at such stations and, within the limits of this chapter or other existing law, to perform such duties as he or she shall designate. The Commissioner may determine what members other than State Police shall give bonds, and prescribe the conditions and amount of the bonds.

HISTORY:

Amended

2005, No. 209

(Adj. Sess.), § 31;

2021, No. 20

, § 155.

§ 1875.
Radio communication system.

The Commissioner shall establish a communication system as will best enable the Department to carry out the purposes of this chapter. This shall include a radio set furnished, on written request, to the sheriff and State’s Attorney of each county on a memorandum receipt.

The Commissioner may charge to all users of telecommunications services managed, maintained, or operated by the Department for the benefit of the users a proportionate share of the actual cost of providing the services and products inclusive of administrative costs.
(b) (1) The Commissioner may charge to all users of telecommunications services managed, maintained, or operated by the Department for the benefit of the users a proportionate share of the actual cost of providing the services and products inclusive of administrative costs.

Such charges shall be based on a pro rata allocation of the actual costs of services or products, determined in an equitable manner, which shall be representative of services provided to or system usage by individual units of government, including State, local, and federal agencies or private nonprofit entities.

Such charges shall be credited to the Vermont Law Telecommunications Special Fund and shall be available to the Department to offset the costs of providing the services.

HISTORY:

Amended

1967, No. 48

, § 1, eff. March 23, 1967;

1969, No. 266

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 8, 1970;

1999, No. 49

, § 162;

2019, No. 166

(Adj. Sess.), § 25, eff. Oct. 1, 2020.

§ 1876.
Headquarters and stations; equipment.

The Commissioner shall establish headquarters and stations in such localities as he or she deems advisable for the enforcement of the laws of the State, and to that end, within the limits of appropriations, he or she may lease, or otherwise acquire, in the name of the State the right to use and maintain lands and buildings, and may purchase or otherwise acquire horses, motor equipment, and other supplies including radio and all other equipment and services the Commissioner deems essential for the needs of the Department or its members in carrying out their duties. The Commissioner may discontinue a headquarters or station, where he or she determines such action to be desirable. The Commissioner may sell such property as shall have become unnecessary or unfit for further use, and all monies received from the sale shall be paid into the State Treasury and credited to the appropriation for the Department.

HISTORY:

Amended

2021, No. 20

, § 156.

§ 1877.
Repealed. 1999, No. 151 (Adj. Sess.), § 9.

§ 1878.
Appointment or promotion of members.

Within the limits of the appropriation for the Department, and in accordance with section 1921 of this title, the Commissioner may appoint or promote members to the ranks, grades, and position deemed necessary for efficient administration. The Commissioner may devise and administer examinations designed to test the qualifications of members and only those applicants shall be appointed or promoted who meet the prescribed standards and qualifications.

HISTORY:

Amended

1979, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1999, No. 142

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 1879.
Training school and courses.

The Commissioner of Public Safety may provide additional in-service training beyond basic training to personnel in the Department.
The Commissioner may seek certification of such training from the Director of the Vermont Criminal Justice Council.

HISTORY:

Amended

1979, No. 57

, § 16.

§ 1879a.
Location of in-service training.

In-service training beyond basic training provided personnel in the Department shall, when cost effective, be held at the State-owned law enforcement and fire service training facility in Pittsford. Such training operations and facilities of the Department shall when practicable be made available to other State and municipal law enforcement personnel. Notwithstanding the requirement of this section, in-service training of one day or less in duration, or longer duration if no commercial overnight lodging is required, may be provided at a Department duty station for the personnel assigned to that Department.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 233

(Adj. Sess.), § 43a, eff. June 21, 1994.

§ 1880.
Disciplinary procedures.

Any disciplinary action taken by the Department against a member of the Department, except a temporary suspension, shall be taken pursuant to the procedures set forth in this section.

Within seven days after the delivery to a member of written charges against such member, the member may file with the Commissioner a request for a hearing before a hearing panel appointed in accordance with subsection (d) of this section, which request shall be honored.

If the charged member does not request a hearing within seven days after receipt of the written charges, the Commissioner may take such disciplinary action as the Commissioner deems appropriate, including reprimand, transfer, suspension, demotion, or removal. The member may appeal the charges and the disciplinary action taken by filing an appeal with the State Labor Relations Board within 30 days of the imposition of disciplinary action by the Commissioner. When the disciplinary action taken by the Commissioner is dismissal, the State Labor Relations Board shall schedule a hearing within 60 days after filing of the appeal, subject to the rules of the Board. All hearings before the Board under this subsection shall be de novo.

If the member requests a hearing panel, the Commissioner shall provide the member with the names of five members, at least one of whom shall have the rank of lieutenant or higher, who have had no connection with the matters at issue. The member shall choose three members from the five names to serve as the hearing panel, provided that at least one member shall have the rank of lieutenant or higher. As soon as is practicable, the panel shall schedule a hearing, at which the member or the member’s representative, or both, may cross examine witnesses and present evidence. The panel may issue subpoenas. At the discretion of the charged member the hearing may be closed or public.

The panel shall report to the Commissioner whether or not the charges have been proved by a preponderance of the evidence. The panel may make recommendations to the Commissioner regarding disciplinary action to be taken if the charges are proved.

If the panel finds that the charges are not proved, any pay or other rights lost through temporary suspension shall be restored. If the panel finds the charges are proved, the Commissioner shall take such disciplinary action as the Commissioner deems appropriate, including reprimand, transfer, suspension, demotion, or removal. The decision of the panel and any resulting disciplinary action taken by the Commissioner are final.

HISTORY:

Amended

1979, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1983, No. 230

(Adj. Sess.), § 12;

1991, No. 25

;

1995, No. 98

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 1881.
Expenses; lodging and subsistence.

The Commissioner shall approve vouchers in payment of expenses incurred by a member in the discharge of his or her duties, to be paid out of appropriations for the Department in the manner required by law.
Allowance for lodging and subsistence while away from his or her official station may be paid to a member under such terms and conditions as the Commissioner may prescribe, subject to collective bargaining.
The Commissioner may provide lodging and subsistence for a member at his or her official station.

HISTORY:

Amended

1981, No. 91

, § 19.

§ 1882.
Subpoenas.

In connection with any investigation into the internal affairs of the Department, the Commissioner may request subpoenas for the testimony of witnesses or the production of evidence. The fees for travel and attendance of witnesses shall be the same as for witnesses and officers before a Superior Court. The fees in connection with subpoenas issued on behalf of the Commissioner or the Department shall be paid by the State, upon presentation of proper bills of costs to the Commissioner. Notwithstanding

3 V.S.A. §§ 809a

and 809b, subpoenas requested by the Commissioner shall be issued and enforced by the Superior Court of the unit in which the person subpoenaed resides in accordance with the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 5; amended

1983, No. 230

(Adj. Sess.), § 12a;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 157.

§ 1883.
State law enforcement; memorandum of understanding.

The Commissioner of Public Safety shall develop and execute a memorandum of understanding with the Commissioners of Fish and Wildlife, of Motor Vehicles, and of Liquor and Lottery and their respective directors of law enforcement. The memorandum of understanding shall be reviewed at least every two years and shall at a minimum address:

Maximizing collective resources by reducing or eliminating redundancies and implementing a methodology that will enhance overall coordination and communication while supporting the mission of individual enforcement agencies.

Providing for an overall statewide law enforcement strategic plan supported by quarterly planning and implementation strategy sessions to improve efficiencies and coordination on an operational level and ensure interagency cooperation and collaboration of programs funded through grants. The strategic plan should identify clear goals and performance measures that demonstrate results, as well as specific strategic plans for individual enforcement agencies.

Creating a task force concept that will provide for the sharing and disseminating of information and recommendations involving various levels of statewide law enforcement throughout Vermont that will benefit all law enforcement agencies as well as citizens.

Developing an integrated and coordinated approach to multi-agency special teams with the goal of creating a force multiplier, where feasible. These teams will be coordinated by the Vermont State Police during training and deployments.

Providing for the Commissioner of Public Safety, with the approval of the Governor and in consultation with the Commissioners of Motor Vehicles, of Fish and Wildlife, and of Liquor and Lottery, to assume the role of lead coordinator of statewide law enforcement units in the event of elevated alerts, critical incidents, and all hazard events. The lead coordinator shall maintain control until in his or her judgment the event no longer requires coordinated action to ensure the public safety.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 105

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 13, 2010; amended

2011, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 51, eff. May 14, 2012;

2015, No. 11

, § 26;

2019, No. 73

, § 30.